Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-479
Sections; applicability to any operator's license.

Sections 60-479.01 to 60-4,118 and 60-4,182 to 60-4,189 shall apply to any operator's license subject to the Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act.

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 29;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 72;

Laws 1995, LB 467, § 7;

Laws 1997, LB 210, § 3;

Laws 1997, LB 256, § 5;

Laws 2001, LB 38, § 10;

Laws 2001, LB 574, § 2;

Laws 2003, LB 209, § 2;

Laws 2008, LB911, § 7;

Laws 2011, LB215, § 3;

Laws 2013, LB93, § 2;

Laws 2014, LB983, § 8;

Laws 2016, LB311, § 5;

Laws 2026, LB972, § 54.
July 18, 2026